Washington statutes.
RCW 18.28.180

Administrative procedure act to govern administration.

The administrative procedure act, chapter 34.05 RCW, shall wherever applicable herein, govern the rights, remedies, and procedures respecting the administration of this chapter.

[ 1967 c 201 s 18.]